Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.07.010

Adoption of charter code city classification authorized.

Any city having ten thousand inhabitants which is governed under a charter may become a charter code city by a procedure prescribed in this chapter and be governed under this title, with the powers conferred hereby.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.07.010.]